Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; INTERSECTION IN HAM LAKE.new text end new text begin $2,273,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to the city of Ham Lake for construction of intersection safety improvements at marked Trunk Highway 65 and Anoka County Road 60 in the city of Ham Lake, including construction and realignment of associated frontage and backage roads. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end